Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,109
Hospital authority; bonds; obligations; secure; powers of authority.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of any obligations under a lease and in order to secure the payment of such bonds or obligations, the authority shall have power:

(1) To pledge by resolution, trust indenture, or other contract, all or any part of its income, rents, fees, revenue or other funds;

(2) To covenant to impose and maintain such schedule of fees and charges as will produce funds sufficient to pay operating costs and debt service;

(3) To covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any hospital facility or any part thereof, or with respect to limitations on its right to undertake additional hospital facilities;

(4) To covenant against pledging all or any part of its income, rents, fees, revenue and other funds to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon;

(5) To provide for the release of income, rents, fees, revenue and other funds, from any pledge and to reserve rights and powers in, or the right to dispose of property, the income, rents, fees and revenue from which are subject to a pledge;

(6) To covenant as to the bonds to be issued pursuant to any resolution, trust indenture, or other instrument and as to the issuance of such bonds in escrow or otherwise, and as to the use and disposition of the proceeds thereof;

(7) To covenant as to what other, or additional debt, may be incurred by it;

(8) To provide for the terms, form, registration, exchange, execution and authentication of bonds;

(9) To provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds;

(10) To covenant as to the use of any or all of its property, real or personal;

(11) To create or to authorize the creation of special funds in which there shall be segregated: (a) The proceeds of any bequest, gift, loan or grant; (b) all of the income, rents, fees and revenue of any hospital facility or facilities or parts thereof; (c) any money held for the payment of the costs of operation and maintenance of any such hospital facilities or as a reserve for the meeting of contingencies in the operation and maintenance thereof; (d) any money held for the payment of the principal and interest on its bonds or the sums due under its leases or as a reserve for such payments; and (e) any money held for any other reserve or contingencies; and to covenant as to the use and disposal of the money held in such funds;

(12) To redeem the bonds, and to covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof;

(13) To covenant against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or interest thereon, directly or indirectly, by any means or in any manner;

(14) To prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the authority may issue additional parity or junior lien bonds;

(15) To prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent may be given;

(16) To covenant as to the maintenance of its property, the replacement thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon and the use and disposition of insurance money;

(17) To vest in an obligee of the authority the right, in the event of the failure of the authority to observe or perform any covenant on its part to be kept or performed, to cure any such default and to advance any money necessary for such purpose, and the money so advanced may be made an additional obligation of the authority with such interest, security and priority as may be provided in any trust indenture, lease or contract of the authority with reference thereto;

(18) To covenant and prescribe as to the events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

(19) To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition, or obligation;

(20) To covenant to surrender possession of all or any part of any hospital facility or facilities the revenue from which have been pledged as provided for in sections 23-3579 to 23-35,120 upon the happening of any event of default, as defined in the contract, and to vest in an obligee the right without judicial proceeding to obtain a substitute lessee for the hospital facilities or any part thereof or to take possession of and to use, operate, manage and control such hospital facilities or any part thereof, and to collect and receive all income, rents, fees and revenue arising therefrom in the same manner as the authority itself might do and to dispose of the money collected in accordance with the agreement of the authority with such obligee;

(21) To vest in a trustee or trustees the right to enforce any covenant made to secure, to pay, or in relation to the bonds, to provide for the powers and duties of such trustee or trustees, to limit liabilities thereof and to provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or any proportion of them may enforce any such covenant;

(22) To make covenants other than in addition to the covenants expressly authorized in this section, of like or different character;

(23) To execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this section or in the performance of its covenants or duties, which may contain such covenants and provisions, in addition to those specified in sections 23-3579 to 23-35,120, as the government or any purchaser of the bonds of the authority may reasonably require; and

(24) To make such covenants and to do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or in the absolute discretion of the authority tend to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated in this section; it being the intention hereof to give the authority power to do all things in the issuance of bonds and in the making of provisions for their security that are not inconsistent with the Constitution of this state without the consent or approval of any judge or court being required therefor.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 36;

Laws 1972, LB 1382, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.109.